Connecticut, session 2026, SB00064.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
one million dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by the
Department of Economic and Community Development for the purpose
of providing a grant-in-aid to the Connecticut Air and Space Center in
the town of Stratford for renovations to an existing hanger at said center.